North Carolina statutes. Chapter 150B. Administrative Procedure Act.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 150B-1.
Policy and scope. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Purpose. — This Chapter establishes a uniform system of administrative rule making and adjudicatory procedures for agencies. The procedures ensure that the functions of rule making, investigation, advocacy, and adjudication are not all performed by the same person in the administrative process.

Rights. — This Chapter confers procedural rights.

Full Exemptions. — This Chapter applies to every agency except:

The North Carolina National Guard in exercising its court-martial jurisdiction.

The Department of Health and Human Services in exercising its authority over the Camp Butner reservation granted in Article 6 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes.

The Utilities Commission.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-287, s. 21(a), effective June 24, 2011, and applicable to rules adopted on or after that date.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-401, s. 1.10(a), effective November 1, 2011.

The State Board of Elections in administering the HAVA Administrative Complaint Procedure of Article 8A of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.

The North Carolina State Lottery.

[Expired June 30, 2012.]

Exemptions from Rule Making. — Article 2A of this Chapter does not apply to the following:

The Commission.

Repealed by Session Laws 2000-189, s. 14, effective July 1, 2000.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-474, s. 34, effective November 29, 2001.

The Department of Revenue, with respect to the notice and hearing requirements contained in Part 2 of Article 2A. With respect to the Secretary of Revenue’s authority to redetermine the State net taxable income of a corporation under

G.S. 105-130.5

A, the Department is subject to the rule-making requirements of

G.S. 105-262.1

.

The North Carolina Global TransPark Authority with respect to the acquisition, construction, operation, or use, including fees or charges, of any portion of a cargo airport complex.

The Department of Public Safety, with respect to matters relating to executions under Article 19 of Chapter 15 of the General Statutes and matters relating solely to persons in its custody or under its supervision, including prisoners, probationers, and parolees.

(6a)

The Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission with respect to establishing minimum standards for in-service training for criminal justice officers under G.S. 17C-6(a)(14).

(6b)

The Sheriffs’ Education and Training Standards Commission with respect to establishing minimum standards for in-service training for justice officers under G.S. 17E-4(a)(11).

The State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees in administering the provisions of Article 3B of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes.

The North Carolina Federal Tax Reform Allocation Committee, with respect to the adoption of the annual qualified allocation plan required by 26 U.S.C. § 42(m), and any agency designated by the Committee to the extent necessary to administer the annual qualified allocation plan.

The Department of Health and Human Services in adopting new or amending existing medical coverage policies for the State Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs pursuant to

G.S. 108A-54.2

.

The Economic Investment Committee in developing criteria for the Job Development Investment Grant Program under Part 2F of Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes.

The North Carolina State Ports Authority with respect to fees established pursuant to G.S. 136-262(a)(11).

The Department of Commerce and the Economic Investment Committee in developing criteria and administering the Site Infrastructure Development Program under G.S. 143B-437.02.

The Department of Commerce and the Governor’s Office in developing guidelines for the One North Carolina Fund under Part 2H of Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 8.18(a), as amended by Session Laws 2011-391, s. 19, effective June 15, 2011.

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-445, s. 41(b), effective August 7, 2009.

The State Ethics Commission with respect to Chapter 138A and Chapter 120C of the General Statutes.

The Department of Commerce in developing guidelines for the NC Green Business Fund under Part 2B of Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes.

The Department of Commerce and the Economic Investment Committee in developing criteria and administering the Job Maintenance and Capital Development Fund under G.S. 143B-437.012.

(18a)

The Department of Commerce in developing criteria and administering the Expanded Gas Products Service to Agriculture Fund under G.S. 143B-437.020.

(18b)

The Department of Commerce in administering the Film and Entertainment Grant Fund under G.S. 143B-437.02A.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 8.18(a), as amended by Session Laws 2011-391, s. 19, effective June 15, 2011.

The Department of Health and Human Services in implementing, operating, or overseeing new 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver programs or amendments to existing 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver programs.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

The Department of Health and Human Services with respect to the content of State Plans, State Plan Amendments, and Waivers approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) for the North Carolina Medicaid Program and the NC Health Choice program.

The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources with respect to operating hours, admission fees, or related activity fees at historic sites and museums pursuant to

G.S. 121-7.3

.

Tryon Palace Commission with respect to operating hours, admission fees, or related activity fees pursuant to G.S. 143B-71.

U.S.S. Battleship Commission with respect to operating hours, admission fees, or related activity fees pursuant to G.S. 143B-73.

The Board of Agriculture in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services with respect to the following:

Annual admission fees for the State Fair.

Operating hours, admission fees, or related activity fees at State forests.

The Board shall annually post the admission fee and operating hours schedule on its Web site and provide notice of the schedule, along with a citation to this section, to all persons named on the mailing list maintained pursuant to G.S. 150B-21.2(d).

Fee schedules for the preparation of forest management plans developed pursuant to

G.S. 106-1004

.

Fees for State phytosanitary certificates.

The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources with respect to operating hours, admission fees, or related activity fees at:

The North Carolina Zoological Park pursuant to G.S. 143B-135.205.

State parks pursuant to G.S. 143B-135.16.

The North Carolina Aquariums pursuant to G.S. 143B-135.188.

The North Carolina Museum of Natural Sciences.

The exclusion from rule making for the setting of operating hours set forth in this subdivision (i) shall not apply to a decision to eliminate all public operating hours for the sites and facilities listed and (ii) does not authorize any of the sites and facilities listed in this subdivision that do not currently charge an admission fee to charge an admission fee until authorized by an act of the General Assembly.

The Division of Motor Vehicles with respect to fee adjustments under

G.S. 20-4.02

.

The Commission for Public Health with respect to adding to the Newborn Screening Program established under

G.S. 130A-125

screening tests for Pompe disease, Mucopolysaccharidosis Type I (MPS I), and X-Linked Adrenoleukodystrophy (X-ALD).

(For applicability, see editor’s note) The Retirement System Boards of Trustees established under

G.S. 128-28

and

G.S. 135-6

when adopting actuarial tables, assumptions, and contribution-based benefit cap factors after presentation of recommendations from the actuary. This exemption includes, but is not limited to, the following actuarial tables, assumptions, methods, and factors:

Joint and survivor tables.

Reserve transfer tables.

Interest rate assumptions.

Salary increase assumptions.

Mortality assumptions.

Separation and retirement assumptions.

Asset smoothing methods.

Actuarial cost methods.

Contribution-based benefit cap factors.

Required contribution rates.

Amortization policies.

The Retirement System Board of Trustees established under

G.S. 128-28

with respect to determining if the total fund is providing sufficient investment gains to cover the additional actuarial liabilities on account of a one-time pension supplement authorized under G.S. 128-27(k1).

Exemptions From Contested Case Provisions. — The contested case provisions of this Chapter apply to all agencies and all proceedings not expressly exempted from the Chapter. The contested case provisions of this Chapter do not apply to the following:

The Department of Health and Human Services and the Department of Environmental Quality in complying with the procedural safeguards mandated by Section 680 of Part H of Public Law 99-457 as amended (Education of the Handicapped Act Amendments of 1986).

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 501, s. 29.

, (4) Repealed by Session Laws 2001-474, s. 35, effective November 29, 2001.

(5)

Hearings required pursuant to the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, (Public Law 93-122), as amended and federal regulations promulgated thereunder. G.S. 150B-51(a) is considered a contested case hearing provision that does not apply to these hearings.

(6)

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-491, s. 2, effective January 1, 2008.

(7)

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction.

(8)

The Department of Transportation, except as provided in G.S. 136-29.

(9)

The North Carolina Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission.

(10)

The North Carolina Global TransPark Authority with respect to the acquisition, construction, operation, or use, including fees or charges, of any portion of a cargo airport complex.

(11)

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-177, s. 8.2, effective July 26, 2019.

(12)

The State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees respect to disputes involving the performance, terms, or conditions of a contract between the Plan and an entity under contract with the Plan.

(13)

The State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees with respect to (i) decisions by the Executive Administrator that an internal appeal is not subject to external review under

G.S. 135-48.24

, or (ii) a determination by the Executive Administrator, the Plan’s designated utilization review organization, or a self-funded health maintenance organization under contract with the Plan that an admission, availability of care, continued stay, or other health care service has been reviewed and, based upon the information provided, does not meet the Plan’s benefits offering, or requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness, health care setting, level of care, or effectiveness, and the requested service is therefore denied, reduced, or terminated.

(14)

The Department of Public Safety for hearings and appeals authorized under Chapter 20 of the General Statutes.

(15)

The Wildlife Resources Commission with respect to determinations of whether to authorize or terminate the authority of a person to sell licenses and permits as a license agent of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

(16)

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-399, s. 3, effective July 25, 2011.

(17)

The Department of Health and Human Services with respect to the review of North Carolina Health Choice Program determinations regarding delay, denial, reduction, suspension, or termination of health services, in whole or in part, including a determination about the type or level of services, commenced under G.S. 108A-70.29(b).

(18)

Hearings provided by the Department of Health and Human Services to decide appeals pertaining to adult care home resident discharges initiated by adult care homes under

G.S. 131D-4.8

.

(19)

The Industrial Commission.

(20)

The Department of Commerce for hearings and appeals authorized under Chapter 96 of the General Statutes.

(21)

The Department of Health and Human Services for actions taken under

G.S. 122C-124.2

.

(22)

The Department of Public Safety, with respect to matters relating to executions under Article 19 of Chapter 15 of the General Statutes.

(23)

The Secretary of Environmental Quality for the waiver or modification of non-State cost-share requirements under

G.S. 143-215.73

J.

(24)

The Department of Information Technology in the written decision from a protest petition under G.S. 143B-1373.

(25)

The Department of Health and Human Services with respect to disputes involving the performance, terms, or conditions of a contract between the Department and a prepaid health plan, as defined in

G.S. 108D-1

.

(26)

The State Board of Education with respect to the disapproval, termination, renewal, or nonrenewal of charters under Article 14A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.

Exemption for the University of North Carolina. — Except as provided in

G.S. 143-135.3

, no Article in this Chapter except Article 4 applies to The University of North Carolina.

Exemption for the State Board of Community Colleges. — Except as provided in

G.S. 143-135.3

, no Article in this Chapter except Article 4 applies to the State Board of Community Colleges.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1975, c. 390; c. 716, s. 5; c. 721, s. 1; c. 742, s. 4; 1981, c. 614, s. 22; 1983, c. 147, s. 2; c. 927, s. 13; 1985, c. 746, ss. 1, 19; 1987, c. 112, s. 2; c. 335, s. 2; c. 536, s. 1; c. 847, s. 2; c. 850, s. 20; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1082, s. 14; c. 1111, s. 9; 1989, c. 76, s. 29; c. 168, s. 33; c. 373, s. 2; c. 538, s. 1; c. 751, s. 7(44); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 36; 1991, c. 103, s. 1; c. 418, s. 2; c. 477, s. 1; c. 749, ss. 9, 10; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 46; 1993, c. 501, s. 29; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 777, ss. 4(j), 4(k); 1995, c. 249, s. 4; c. 507, s. 27.8(m); 1997-35, s. 2; 1997-278, s. 1; 1997-412, s. 8; 1997-443, ss. 11A.110, 11A.119(a); 2000-189, s. 14; 2001-192, s. 1; 2001-299, s. 1; 2001-395, s. 6(c); 2001-424, ss. 6.20(b), 21.20(c); 2001-446, s. 5(d); 2001-474, ss. 34, 35; 2001-496, s. 8(c); 2002-99, s. 7(b); 2002-159, ss. 31.5(b), 49; 2002-172, s. 2.6; 2002-190, s. 16; 2003-226, s. 17(b); 2003-416, s. 2; 2003-435, 2nd Ex. Sess., s. 1.3; 2004-88, s. 1(e); 2005-133, s. 10; 2005-276, s. 31.1(ff); 2005-300, s. 1; 2005-344, s. 11.1; 2005-455, s. 3.3; 2006-66, ss. 12.8(c), 8.10(d); 2006-201, s. 2(a); 2007-323, ss. 13.2(c), 28.22A(o); 2007-345, s. 12; 2007-491, s. 2; 2007-552, 1st. Ex. Sess., s. 3; 2008-107, s. 10.15A(f); 2008-168, s. 5(a); 2008-187, s. 26(b); 2009-445, s. 41(b); 2009-475, s. 4; 2009-523, s. 2(a); 2010-70, s. 2; 2011-85, s. 2.11(a); 2011-145, ss. 8.18(a), (b), 14.6(j), 19.1(g), (h); 2011-264, s. 4; 2011-272, s. 5; 2011-287, s. 21(a), (b); 2011-391, s. 19; 2011-399, ss. 2, 3; 2011-401, ss. 1.10(a), (b); 2012-43, s. 3; 2013-85, s. 10; 2013-360, ss. 19.2(d), 12H.6(c), 12H.9(c); 2014-100, ss. 13.2(a), 15.13(b), 15.14B(b); 2014-103, s. 17; 2015-198, ss. 3, 4; 2015-241, ss. 14.6(g), 14.11(a), 14.30(c), (s), (u), (v), (w), 29.30(t); 2016-113, s. 7(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2017-186, s. 2(ddddddddd); 2017-212, s. 4.3; 2018-5, ss. 11E.1(b), 37.1(h); 2018-142, s. 21; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1; 2019-81, s. 10; 2019-165, s. 7; 2019-177, s. 8.2; 2020-48, s. 4.1(c); 2021-125, s. 3(c); 2021-138, s. 12(a); 2021-178, s. 3(b); 2021-180, ss. 10.2(b), 14.2(b); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(oooo).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 150B-1

.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws
2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor conformed multiple references in subdivisions (c)(6) and (d)(16).

Session Laws
2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1, repealed Session Laws
2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws
2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subdivisions (c)(6) and (d)(16).

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 10.15A(e1)-(e4), as amended by Session Laws
2009-526, s. 2(c), and Session Laws
2009-550, s. 1.1(c), provides: “(e1) For the purpose of expediting the resolution of community support provider appeals and thereby saving State and federal funds that are paid for services that are found to be unnecessary or otherwise ineligible for payment, the Department shall implement on a temporary basis a community support provider appeals process. The process shall be a substitute for informal provider appeals at the Department level and formal provider appeals by the Office of Administrative Hearings. The community support provider appeals process shall apply to a community support services provider:

“(1) Who is aggrieved by a decision of the Department to reduce, deny, recoup, or recover reimbursement for community support services, or to deny, suspend, or revoke a provider agreement to provide community support services.

“(2) Whose endorsement has been withdrawn or whose application for endorsement has been denied by a local management entity.

“(e2) The community support provider appeals process shall be developed and implemented as follows:

“(1) A hearing under this section shall be commenced by filing a petition with the chief hearings clerk of the Department within 30 days of the mailing of the notice by the Department of the action giving rise to the contested case. The petition shall identify the petitioner, be signed by the party or representative of the party, and shall describe the agency action giving rise to the contested case. As used in this section, “file or filing” means to place the paper or item to be filed into the care and custody of the chief hearings clerk of the Department and acceptance thereof by the chief hearings clerk, except that the hearing officer may permit the papers to be filed with the hearing officer, in which event the hearing officer shall note thereon the filing date. The Department shall supply forms for use in these contested cases.

“(2) If there is a timely request for an appeal, the Department shall promptly designate a hearing officer who shall hold an evidentiary hearing. The hearing officer shall conduct the hearing according to applicable federal law and regulations and shall ensure that:

“a. Notice of the hearing is given not less than 15 days before the hearing. The notice shall state the date, hour, and place of the hearing and shall be deemed to have been given on the date that a copy of the notice is mailed, via certified mail, to the address provided by the petitioner in the petition for hearing.

“b. The hearing is held in Wake County, except that the hearing officer may, take testimony and receive evidence by telephone or other electronic means. The petitioner and the petitioner’s legal representative may appear before the hearing officer in Wake County.

“c. Discovery is no more extensive or formal than that required by federal law and regulations applicable to the hearings. Prior to and during the hearing, a provider representative shall have adequate opportunity to examine the provider’s own case file. No later than five days before the date of the hearing, each party to a contested case shall identify each witness that the party intends to call.

“(3) The hearing officer shall have the power to administer oaths and affirmations and regulate the conduct of the hearing. The following shall apply to hearings held pursuant to this section:

“a. At the hearing, the parties may present such sworn evidence, law, and regulations as are relevant to the issues in the case.

“b. The petitioner and the respondent agency each have a right to be represented by a person of his choice, including an attorney obtained at the party’s own expense.

“c. The petitioner and the respondent agency shall each have the right to cross-examine witnesses as well as make a closing argument summarizing his view of the case and the law.

“d. The appeal hearing shall be recorded. If a petition for judicial review is filed the Department shall include a copy of the recording of the hearing as part of the official record. The recording of the appeal hearing may be erased or otherwise destroyed 180 days after the final decision is mailed as provided in
G.S. 108A-79(i)(5).

“(4) The hearing officer shall decide the case based upon a preponderance of the evidence, giving deference to the demonstrated knowledge and expertise of the agency as provided in
G.S. 150B-34(a). The hearing officer shall prepare a proposal for the decision, citing relevant law, regulations, and evidence, which shall be served upon the petitioner or the petitioner’s representative by certified mail, with a copy furnished to the respondent agency.

“(5) The petitioner and the respondent agency shall have 15 days from the date of the mailing of the proposal for decision to present written arguments in opposition to or in support of the proposal for decision to the designated official of the Department who will make the final decision. If neither written arguments are presented, nor extension of time granted by the final agency decision maker for good cause, within 15 days of the date of the mailing of the proposal for decision, the proposal for decision becomes final. If written arguments are presented, such arguments shall be considered and the final decision shall be rendered. The final decision shall be rendered not more than 180 days from the date of the filing of the petition. This time limit may be extended by agreement of the parties or by final agency decision maker, for good cause shown. The final decision shall be served upon the petitioner or the petitioner’s representative by certified mail, with a copy furnished to the respondent agency. In the absence of a petition for judicial review filed pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, the final decision shall be binding upon the petitioner and the Department.

“(6) A petitioner who is dissatisfied with the final decision of the Department may file, within 30 days of the service of the decision, a petition for judicial review in the Superior Court of Wake County or of the county from which the case arose. The judicial review shall be conducted according to Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

“(7) In the event of a conflict between federal law or regulations and State law or regulations, federal law or regulations shall control. This section applies to all petitions that are filed by a Medicaid community support services provider on or after July 1, 2008, and for all Medicaid community support services provider petitions that have been filed at the Office of Administrative Hearings previous to July 1, 2008, but for which a hearing on the merits has not been commenced prior to that date. The requirement that the agency decision must be rendered not more than 180 days from the date of the filing of the petition for hearing shall not apply to (i) community support services provider petitions that were filed at the Office of Administrative Hearings or (ii) requests for a hearing under the Department’s informal settlement process prior to the effective date of this act. The Office of Administrative Hearings shall transfer all cases affected by this section to the Department of Health and Human Services within 30 days of the effective date of this section. This act preempts the existing informal appeal process and reconsideration review process at the Department of Health and Human Services and the existing appeal process at the Office of Administrative Hearings with regard to all appeals filed by Medicaid community support services providers under the Medical Assistance program.

“(e3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Department of Health and Human Services may, pursuant to its statutory authority or federal Medicaid requirements, suspend the endorsement or Medicaid participation of a provider of community support services pending a final agency decision based on a fair hearing of the provider’s appeal filed with the Department under its community support provider appeal process. A provider of community support services whose endorsement, Medicaid participation, or services have been suspended is not entitled to payment during the period the appeal is pending, and the Department shall make no such payment to the provider during that period. If the final agency decision is in favor of the provider, the Department shall remove the suspension, commence payment for provider services, and reimburse the provider for payments withheld during the period of appeal. Contracts between the Department or a local management entity and the provider shall contain a provision indicating the circumstances under which a provider may appeal an agency decision and giving notice of the suspension of payments to the provider while the appeal is pending. This subsection applies to community support provider appeals pending in the Department of Health and Human Services or the Office of Administrative Hearings, as applicable, on and after July 1, 2008.

“(e4) The Department’s community support provider appeals process established under this section shall expire July 1, 2010. The Department shall report to the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, and the Fiscal Research Division on March 1, 2009, October 1, 2009, and March 1, 2010, on the effectiveness and efficiency of the community support provider appeals process.”

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 10.15A(h1)-(h6), as amended and added to by Session Laws
2008-118, s. 3.13(a), (b), Session Laws
2009-526, s. 2(a) and (b), and Session Laws
2009-550, s. 1.1(a) and (b), provides for administrative appeals by Medicaid applicants and recipients. See notes under

G.S. 108A-54

.

§ 150B-2.
Definitions.

As used in this Chapter, the following definitions apply:

Administrative law judge. — A person appointed under

G.S. 7A-752

, 7A-753, or 7A-757.

(1a)

Adopt. — To take final action to create, amend, or repeal a rule.

(1b)

Agency. — An agency or an officer in the executive branch of the government of this State. The term includes the Council of State, the Governor’s Office, a board, a commission, a department, a division, a council, and any other unit of government in the executive branch. A local unit of government is not an agency.

(1c)

Codifier of Rules. — The person appointed by the Chief Administrative Law Judge of the Office of Administrative Hearings pursuant to

G.S. 7A-760(b)

.

(1d)

Commission. — The Rules Review Commission.

Contested case. — An administrative proceeding pursuant to this Chapter to resolve a dispute between an agency and another person that involves the person’s rights, duties, or privileges, including licensing or the levy of a monetary penalty. The term does not include rulemaking, declaratory rulings, or the award or denial of a scholarship, a grant, or a loan.

(2a)

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 418, s. 3.

(2b)

Hearing officer. — A person or group of persons designated by an agency that is subject to Article 3A of this Chapter to preside in a contested case hearing conducted under that Article.

License. — Any certificate, permit, or other evidence, by whatever name called, of a right or privilege to engage in any activity, except licenses issued under Chapter 20 and Subchapter I of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes, occupational licenses, and certifications of electronic poll books, ballot duplication systems, or voting systems under

G.S. 163-165.7

.

Licensing. — Any administrative action issuing, failing to issue, suspending, or revoking a license or occupational license. The term does not include controversies over whether an examination was fair or whether the applicant passed the examination.

(4a)

Occupational license. — Any certificate, permit, or other evidence, by whatever name called, of a right or privilege to engage in a profession, occupation, or field of endeavor that is issued by an occupational licensing agency.

(4b)

Occupational licensing agency. — Any board, commission, committee, or other agency of the State that is established for the primary purpose of regulating the entry of persons into, or the conduct of persons within a particular profession, occupation, or field of endeavor, and that is authorized to issue and revoke licenses. The term does not include State agencies or departments that may as only a part of their regular function issue permits or licenses.

Party. — Any person or agency named or admitted as a party or properly seeking as of right to be admitted as a party and includes the agency as appropriate.

(5a)

Person. — Any natural person, partnership, corporation, body politic, and any unincorporated association, organization, or society that may sue or be sued under a common name.

Person aggrieved. — Any person or group of persons of common interest directly or indirectly affected substantially in his, her, or its person, property, or employment by an administrative decision.

Recodified as subdivision (5a) of this section by Session Laws 2021-88, s. 16(a), effective July 22, 2021.

(7a)

Policy. — Any nonbinding interpretive statement within the delegated authority of an agency that merely defines, interprets, or explains the meaning of a statute or rule. The term includes any document issued by an agency that is intended and used purely to assist a person to comply with the law, such as a guidance document.

Residence. — Domicile or principal place of business.

(8a)

Rule. — Any agency regulation, standard, or statement of general applicability that implements or interprets an enactment of the General Assembly or Congress or a regulation adopted by a federal agency or that describes the procedure or practice requirements of an agency. The term includes the establishment of a fee and the amendment or repeal of a prior rule. The term does not include the following:

Statements concerning only the internal management of an agency or group of agencies within the same principal office or department enumerated in

G.S. 143A-11

or 143B-6, including policies and procedures manuals, if the statement does not directly or substantially affect the procedural or substantive rights or duties of a person not employed by the agency or group of agencies.

Budgets and budget policies and procedures issued by the Director of the Budget, by the head of a department, as defined by

G.S. 143A-2

or G.S. 143B-3, or by an occupational licensing board, as defined by

G.S. 93B-1

.

Nonbinding interpretative statements within the delegated authority of an agency that merely define, interpret, or explain the meaning of a statute or rule.

A form, the contents or substantive requirements of which are prescribed by rule or statute.

Statements of agency policy made in the context of another proceeding, including:

Declaratory rulings under

G.S. 150B-4

.

Orders establishing or fixing rates or tariffs.

Requirements, communicated to the public by the use of signs or symbols, concerning the use of public roads, bridges, ferries, buildings, or facilities.

Statements that set forth criteria or guidelines to be used by the staff of an agency in performing audits, investigations, or inspections; in settling financial disputes or negotiating financial arrangements; or in the defense, prosecution, or settlement of cases.

Scientific, architectural, or engineering standards, forms, or procedures, including design criteria and construction standards used to construct or maintain highways, bridges, or ferries.

Job classification standards, job qualifications, and salaries established for positions under the jurisdiction of the State Human Resources Commission.

Establishment of the interest rate that applies to tax assessments under

G.S. 105-241.21

.

The State Medical Facilities Plan, if the Plan has been prepared with public notice and hearing as provided in G.S. 131E-176(25), reviewed by the Commission for compliance with G.S. 131E-176(25), and approved by the Governor.

Standards adopted by the State Chief Information Officer and applied to information technology as defined in G.S. 143B-1320.

(8b)

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-398, s. 61.2, effective July 25, 2011.

(8c)

Substantial evidence. — Relevant evidence a reasonable mind might accept as adequate to support a conclusion.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 418, s. 3.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, ss. 61, 62; 1977, c. 915, s. 5; 1983, c. 641, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1022, s. 1(2)-1(5); 1987, c. 878, ss. 1, 2, 21; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1111, s. 17; 1991, c. 418, s. 3; c. 477, ss. 3.1, 3.2, 9; 1995, c. 390, s. 29; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 7.10(g); 1997-456, s. 27; 2003-229, s. 12; 2007-491, s. 44(1)b; 2011-13, s. 2; 2011-398, ss. 15, 61.2; 2013-188, s. 7; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2013-413, s. 1; 2015-2, s. 2.2(c); 2015-241, ss. 7A.3, 30.16(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-13, s. 3.8(b); 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 4.5(b); 2021-88, s. 16(a), (b).

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws
2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement” for “State Board of Elections” in sub-subdivision (8a)b. The reference was deleted by Session Laws
2018-146, s. 4.5(b).

Session Laws
2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1, repealed Session Laws
2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws
2017-6, s. 3.

§ 150B-3.
Special provisions on licensing.

When an applicant or a licensee makes a timely and sufficient application for issuance or renewal of a license or occupational license, including the payment of any required license fee, the existing license or occupational license does not expire until a decision on the application is finally made by the agency, and if the application is denied or the terms of the new license or occupational license are limited, until the last day for applying for judicial review of the agency order. This subsection does not affect agency action summarily suspending a license or occupational license under subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

Before the commencement of proceedings for the suspension, revocation, annulment, withdrawal, recall, cancellation, or amendment of any license other than an occupational license, the agency shall give notice to the licensee, pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 150B-23

. Before the commencement of such proceedings involving an occupational license, the agency shall give notice pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 150B-38

. In either case, the licensee shall be given an opportunity to show compliance with all lawful requirements for retention of the license or occupational license.

If the agency finds that the public health, safety, or welfare requires emergency action and incorporates this finding in its order, summary suspension of a license or occupational license may be ordered effective on the date specified in the order or on service of the certified copy of the order at the last known address of the licensee, whichever is later, and effective during the proceedings. The proceedings shall be promptly commenced and determined.Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as amending or repealing any special statutes, in effect prior to February 1, 1976, which provide for the summary suspension of a license.

This section does not apply to the following:

Revocations of occupational licenses based solely on a court order of child support delinquency or a Department of Health and Human Services determination of child support delinquency issued pursuant to

G.S. 110-142

, 110-142.1, or 110-142.2.

Refusal to renew an occupational license pursuant to

G.S. 87-10.1

, 87-22.2, 87-44.2, or 89C-18.1, based solely on a Department of Revenue determination that the licensee owes a delinquent income tax debt.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1995, c. 538, s. 2(i); 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-162, s. 8.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “The Problem of Procedural Delay in Contested Case Hearings . . .” under the North Carolina APA, see 7 N.C. Cent. L.J. 347 (1976).